Maine, session 132, LD534.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 17-A MRSA §2110 is enacted to read:
§2110. Victim and witness rights when contacted by professional investigator
1. Definitions. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise indicates, the
following terms have the following meanings.
A. "Professional investigator" has the same meaning as in Title 32, section 8103,
subsection 5.
B. "Witness" has the same meaning as in Title 15, section 1412, subsection 3.
2. Disclosures of professional investigator. Prior to communicating with or
otherwise seeking information from a victim or witness, a professional investigator shall
disclose the following to the victim or witness:
A. The purpose of the investigation;
B. The name of the professional investigator's client;
C. The name of any defendant known to the professional investigator's client who will
benefit from the professional investigator's efforts; and
D. That the victim or witness is not required to communicate with the professional
investigator.
If a professional investigator is employed by, compensated by or otherwise contracted to
provide services by the Maine Commission on Public Defense Services under Title 4,
section 1801 or by any criminal defense attorney for purposes of investigating a crime, or
is otherwise working at the direction of or for the benefit of a defendant for purposes of
investigating a crime for which the defendant is charged, the professional investigator shall
disclose to any victim or witness of the crime that the professional investigator is a
professional investigator working for the benefit of the defendant prior to communicating
with or seeking information related to the crime from the victim or witness.
3. Victim or witness request to cease contact. If a victim or witness requests, orally
or in writing, that the professional investigator cease contact with the victim or witness the
professional investigator may not attempt any further communication unless expressly
authorized by the victim or witness.
4. Victim or witness who is a minor. Prior to communicating with or seeking
information from a victim or witness who is a minor, the professional investigator shall
disclose all information required in subsection 2 to a parent or guardian of the minor who
is not the defendant in the criminal case. The professional investigator shall obtain consent
from a parent or guardian of the minor who is not the defendant in the criminal case before
communicating with the minor.